Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,180
Transformational period, defined.

Transformational period means the period of time from the date of the complete application through the earlier of (1) the end of the tenth year after the year in which the complete application was filed with the director or (2) the end of the year in which the applicant attains the one-billion-six-hundred-million-dollar investment requirement.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 96.